Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.782

Budget calculation—Increased enrollment target level—Availability of information.

It is the policy of the state of Washington that higher education enrollments be increased in increments each biennium in order to achieve, by the year 2010, the goals, by educational sector, adopted by the *higher education coordinating board in its enrollment plan entitled "Design for the 21st Century: Expanding Higher Education Opportunities in Washington," or subsequent revisions adopted by the board.

Per student costs for additional students to achieve this policy shall be at the same rate per student as enrollments mandated in RCW 28B.10.776.

For each public college and university, and for the community and technical college system, budget documents generated by the governor and the legislature in the development and consideration of the biennial omnibus appropriations act shall display an enrollment target level. The enrollment target level is the biennial state-funded enrollment increase necessary to fulfill the state policy set forth in this section. The budget documents shall compare the enrollment target level with the state-funded enrollment increases contained in the biennial budget proposals of the governor and each house of the legislature. The information required by this section shall be set forth in the budget documents so that enrollment and cost information concerning the number of students and additional funds needed to reach the enrollment goals are prominently displayed and easily understood.

For the governor's budget request, the information required by this section shall be made available in the document entitled "Operating Budget Supporting Data" or its successor document.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.

Findings—Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 28B.10.776.